Nevada, session 83, SB356.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 678A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. “Consumable hemp product” means hemp, as
defined in NRS 557.160, a commodity or product containing hemp
-
*SB356*

– 3 –
or any other commodity or product that purports to contain
cannabidiol that:
(a) Has a THC concentration that does not exceed the
maximum THC concentration set forth in NRS 557.160 for hemp;
and
(b) Is intended for human consumption by ingestion or
inhalation or for topical application to the skin or hair of a
human.
2. The term does not include a commodity or product that
contains only an approved hemp component, as defined in NRS
446.844, and no other hemp.
Sec. 3. 1. A person shall not manufacture, store, distribute,
advertise, market, sell or offer to sell a consumable hemp product
in this State with a THC concentration that exceeds the limit of
detection.
2. A person shall not sell or offer to sell a consumable hemp
product with a THC concentration that does not exceed the limit
of detection to a person who is under 21 years of age.
3. A consumable hemp product must be sold in a single
package that contains:
(a) A THC concentration that does not exceed the limit of
detection; and
(b) Not more than five servings of a size established by the
Board by regulation.
4. A person who manufactures a consumable hemp product
shall maintain and provide to the Board upon request a certificate
of analysis issued by a cannabis independent testing laboratory
indicating that the consumable hemp product contains a THC
concentration that does not exceed the limit of detection.
5. A person engaged in the sale of consumable hemp
products shall comply with all requirements and restrictions
established by the Board relating to the marketing and advertising
of consumable hemp products.
6. A consumable hemp product that exceeds the limit of
detection in violation of the provisions of this section is subject to
forfeiture pursuant to NRS 179.1156 to 179.121, inclusive.
7. The Board shall adopt regulations governing consumable
hemp products. Such regulations must:
(a) Establish the method of testing consumable hemp products
that is required to be used by a cannabis independent testing
laboratory;
(b) Establish serving sizes for consumable hemp products;
(c) Establish reasonable requirements for and restrictions on
the marketing and advertising of consumable hemp products; and
-
*SB356*

– 4 –
(d) Provide for the investigation of violations of the provisions
of this section and for the imposition of penalties against persons
who commit such violations, including, without limitation,
regulations that:
(1) Establish penalties to be imposed for violations of the
provisions of this section, which may include, without limitation,
the issuance of a cease and desist order or citation and the
imposition of an administrative fine, a civil penalty and other
similar penalties;
(2) Set forth the procedures by which the Board may
impose a penalty against a person for committing a violation of
the provisions of this section; and
(3) Set forth the circumstances under which the Board is
required to refer matters concerning a violation of the provisions
of this section to an appropriate state or local law enforcement
agency.
8. As used in this section, “limit of detection” means the
lowest concentration of THC that can be reliably detected using a
method of testing established by the Board by regulation.
Sec. 4. 1. All money collected by the Board pursuant to
section 3 of this act as fines or penalties must be deposited in the
State Treasury and accounted for separately in the State General
Fund. The money in the account:
(a) May only be used by the Board for carrying out the
purposes of section 3 of this act;
(b) Does not revert to the State General Fund at the end of any
fiscal year; and
(c) Must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
2. The Board shall administer the account. Any interest and
income earned on the money in the account, after deducting any
applicable charges, must be credited to the account.
3. All claims against the account must be paid as other claims
against the State are paid.
Sec. 5. NRS 678A.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.010 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 678A.020 to
678A.240, inclusive, and section 2 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 6. NRS 678A.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.440 In addition to any other powers granted by this title,
the Board has the power to:
1. Enter into interlocal agreements pursuant to NRS 277.080 to
277.180, inclusive.
-
*SB356*

– 5 –
2. Establish and amend a plan of organization for the Board,
including, without limitation, organizations of divisions or sections
with leaders for such divisions or sections.
3. Appear on its own behalf before governmental agencies of
the State or any of its political subdivisions.
4. Apply for and accept any gift, donation, bequest, grant or
other source of money to carry out the provisions of this title.
5. Execute all instruments necessary or convenient for carrying
out the provisions of this title.
6. Prepare, publish and distribute such studies, reports,
bulletins and other materials as the Board deems appropriate.
7. Refer cases to the Attorney General for criminal prosecution.
8. Maintain an official Internet website for the Board.
9. Monitor federal activity regarding cannabis and report its
findings to the Legislature.
10. Employ the services of such persons the Board considers
necessary for the purposes of hearing disciplinary proceedings.
11. In accordance with NRS 179.1156 to 179.121, inclusive,
seize and destroy cannabis and cannabis products involved in
unlicensed cannabis activities.
12. In accordance with NRS 179.1156 to 179.121, inclusive,
seize and destroy consumable hemp products that violate the
provisions of section 3 of this act.
13. Commit resources and take action to address unlicensed
cannabis activities, including, without limitation:
(a) Investigating and referring matters involving unlicensed
cannabis activities to the appropriate state or local law enforcement
agency, including, without limitation, the Investigation Division of
the Department of Public Safety and the Attorney General, for
further investigation and possible criminal prosecution;
(b) Educating the public through various types of media and
communication and other forms of public outreach on the dangers
and illegality of unlicensed cannabis activities and the importance of
having cannabis establishments which are licensed and regulated;
(c) Creating a system through which the public, licensees and
registrants may file confidential reports of unlicensed cannabis
activities; and
(d) Imposing penalties against persons who engage in
unlicensed cannabis activities in accordance with the regulations
adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 678A.450.
14. Commit resources and take action to address violations of
section 3 of this act, including, without limitation:
(a) Investigating and referring matters involving a violation of
section 3 of this act to the appropriate state or local law
enforcement agency, including, without limitation, the
-
*SB356*

– 6 –
Investigation Division of the Department of Public Safety and the
Attorney General, for further investigation and possible criminal
prosecution; and
(b) Imposing penalties against persons who commit violations
of section 3 of this act in accordance with the regulations adopted
by the Board pursuant to section 3 of this act.
Sec. 7. NRS 678B.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.290 1. The Board shall establish standards for and
certify one or more cannabis independent testing laboratories to:
(a) Test cannabis for adult use and adult-use cannabis products
that are to be sold in this State;
(b) Test cannabis for medical use and medical cannabis products
that are to be sold in this State; and
(c) In addition to the testing described in paragraph (a) or (b),
test consumable hemp products and other commodities or products
containing hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160, or cannabidiol which
are intended for human or animal consumption and sold by a
cannabis establishment , [or] a person described in NRS 446.844 [.]
or another person.
2. Such a cannabis independent testing laboratory must be able
to:
(a) Determine accurately, with respect to cannabis or cannabis
products that are sold or will be sold at cannabis sales facilities in
this State:
(1) The concentration therein of THC and cannabidiol.
(2) The presence and identification of microbes, molds and
fungi.
(3) The composition of the tested material.
(4) The presence of chemicals in the tested material,
including, without limitation, pesticides, heavy metals, herbicides or
growth regulators.
(b) Demonstrate the validity and accuracy of the methods used
by the cannabis independent testing laboratory to test cannabis and
cannabis products.
3. To obtain a license to operate a cannabis independent testing
laboratory, an applicant must:
(a) Apply successfully as required pursuant to NRS 678B.210 or
678B.250, as applicable.
(b) Pay the fees required pursuant to NRS 678B.390.
(c) Agree to become accredited pursuant to standard ISO/IEC
17025 of the International Organization for Standardization within 1
year after licensure by an impartial organization that operates in
accordance with standard ISO/IEC 17011 of the International
Organization for Standardization and is a signatory to the Mutual
-
*SB356*

– 7 –
Recognition Arrangement of the International Laboratory
Accreditation Cooperation.
Sec. 8. NRS 678B.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.520 1. Each cannabis establishment shall, in
consultation with the Board, cooperate to ensure that all cannabis
products offered for sale:
(a) Are labeled clearly and unambiguously:
(1) As cannabis with the words “THIS PRODUCT
CONTAINS CANNABIS” in bold type; and
(2) As required by the provisions of this chapter and chapters
678C and 678D of NRS.
(b) Are not presented in packaging that contains an image of a
cartoon character, mascot, action figure, balloon or toy, except that
such an item may appear in the logo of the cannabis production
facility which produced the product.
(c) Are regulated and sold on the basis of the concentration of
THC in the products and not by weight.
(d) Are packaged and labeled in such a manner as to allow
tracking by way of an inventory control system.
(e) Are not packaged and labeled in a manner which is modeled
after a brand of products primarily consumed by or marketed to
children.
(f) Are labeled in a manner which indicates the amount of THC
in the product, measured in milligrams, and includes a statement
that the product contains cannabis and its potency was tested with an
allowable variance of the amount determined by the Board by
regulation.
(g) Are not labeled or marketed as candy.
(h) Are labeled with:
(1) The words “Keep out of reach of children”;
(2) A list of all ingredients used in the cannabis product;
(3) A list of all major food allergens in the cannabis product;
and
(4) Any other information the Board may require by
regulation.
2. A cannabis production facility shall not produce cannabis
products in any form that:
(a) Is or appears to be a lollipop.
(b) Bears the likeness or contains characteristics of a real or
fictional person, animal or fruit, including, without limitation, a
caricature, cartoon or artistic rendering.
(c) Is modeled after a brand of products primarily consumed by
or marketed to children.
-
*SB356*

– 8 –
(d) Is made by applying concentrated cannabis, as defined in
NRS 453.042, to a commercially available candy or snack food item
other than dried fruit, nuts or granola.
3. A cannabis production facility shall:
(a) Seal any cannabis product that consists of cookies or
brownies in a bag or other container which is not transparent.
(b) Maintain a hand washing area with hot water, soap and
disposable towels which is located away from any area in which
cannabis products are cooked or otherwise prepared.
(c) Require each person who handles cannabis products to
restrain his or her hair, wear clean clothing and keep his or her
fingernails neatly trimmed.
(d) Package all cannabis products produced by the cannabis
production facility on the premises of the cannabis production
facility.
4. A cannabis establishment shall not engage in advertising that
in any way makes cannabis or cannabis products appeal to children,
including, without limitation, advertising which uses an image of a
cartoon character, mascot, action figure, balloon, fruit or toy.
5. Each cannabis sales facility shall offer for sale containers for
the storage of cannabis and cannabis products which lock and are
designed to prohibit children from unlocking and opening the
container.
6. A cannabis sales facility shall:
(a) Convey to each purchaser of cannabis or cannabis products
the following information in a manner prescribed by the Board:
(1) To keep cannabis and cannabis products out of the reach
of children;
(2) That cannabis products can cause severe illness in
children;
(3) That allowing children to ingest cannabis or cannabis
products or storing cannabis or cannabis products in a location
which is accessible to children may result in an investigation by an
agency which provides child welfare services or criminal
prosecution for child abuse or neglect;
(4) That the intoxicating effects of edible cannabis products
may be delayed by 2 hours or more and users of edible cannabis
products should initially ingest a small amount of the product, then
wait at least 120 minutes before ingesting any additional amount of
the product;
(5) That pregnant women should consult with a physician
before ingesting cannabis or cannabis products;
(6) That ingesting cannabis or cannabis products with
alcohol or other drugs, including prescription medication, may result
-
*SB356*

– 9 –
in unpredictable levels of impairment and that a person should
consult with a physician before doing so;
(7) That cannabis or cannabis products can impair
concentration, coordination and judgment and a person should not
operate a motor vehicle while under the influence of cannabis or
cannabis products; and
(8) That ingestion of any amount of cannabis or cannabis
products before driving may result in criminal prosecution for
driving under the influence.
(b) Enclose all cannabis and cannabis products in opaque, child-
resistant packaging upon sale.
7. A cannabis sales facility shall allow any person who is at
least 21 years of age to enter the premises of the cannabis sales
facility.
8. If the health authority, as defined in NRS 446.050, where a
cannabis production facility, cannabis sales facility or cannabis
consumption lounge which sells edible cannabis products is located
requires persons who handle food at a food establishment to obtain
certification, the cannabis production facility, cannabis sales facility
or cannabis consumption lounge shall ensure that at least one
employee maintains such certification.
9. A cannabis production facility may , subject to the
provisions of section 3 of this act, sell a consumable hemp product
or other commodity or product made using hemp, as defined in
NRS 557.160, or containing cannabidiol to a cannabis sales facility.
10. In addition to any other product authorized by the
provisions of this title, a cannabis sales facility may , subject to the
provisions of section 3 of this act, sell:
(a) [Any] A consumable hemp product or any other commodity
or product made using hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160;
(b) Any commodity or product containing cannabidiol with a
THC concentration of not more than 0.3 percent; and
(c) Any other product specified by regulation of the Board.
11. A cannabis establishment:
(a) Shall not engage in advertising which contains any statement
or illustration that:
(1) Is false or misleading;
(2) Promotes overconsumption of cannabis or cannabis
products;
(3) Depicts the actual consumption of cannabis or cannabis
products; or
(4) Depicts a child or other person who is less than 21 years
of age consuming cannabis or cannabis products or objects
suggesting the presence of a child, including, without limitation,
toys, characters or cartoons, or contains any other depiction which is
-
*SB356*

– 10 –
designed in any manner to be appealing to or encourage
consumption of cannabis or cannabis products by a person who is
less than 21 years of age.
(b) Shall not advertise in any publication or on radio, television
or any other medium if 30 percent or more of the audience of that
medium is reasonably expected to be persons who are less than 21
years of age.
(c) Shall not place an advertisement:
(1) Within 1,000 feet of a public or private school,
playground, public park or library, but may maintain such an
advertisement if it was initially placed before the school,
playground, public park or library was located within 1,000 feet of
the location of the advertisement;
(2) On or inside of a motor vehicle used for public
transportation or any shelter for public transportation;
(3) At a sports event to which persons who are less than 21
years of age are allowed entry; or
(4) At an entertainment event if it is reasonably estimated
that 30 percent or more of the persons who will attend that event are
less than 21 years of age.
(d) Shall not advertise or offer any cannabis or cannabis product
as “free” or “donated” without a purchase.
(e) Shall ensure that all advertising by the cannabis
establishment contains such warnings as may be prescribed by the
Board, which must include, without limitation, the following words:
(1) “Keep out of reach of children”; and
(2) “For use only by adults 21 years of age and older.”
(f) Shall ensure that all advertising by the cannabis
establishment contains:
(1) The name of the cannabis establishment; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 12, the adult-
use cannabis establishment license number or medical cannabis
establishment license number of the cannabis establishment or any
other unique identifier assigned to the cannabis establishment by the
Board.
12. A cannabis establishment that holds more than one license
may satisfy the requirement set forth in subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (f) of subsection 11 if the cannabis establishment includes
in all advertising conducted by the cannabis establishment:
(a) Any one of the adult-use cannabis establishment license
numbers or medical cannabis establishment license numbers of the
cannabis establishment; or
(b) Any one unique identifier assigned to the cannabis
establishment by the Board.
-
*SB356*

– 11 –
13. Nothing in subsection 11 shall be construed to prohibit a
local government, pursuant to chapter 244, 268 or 278 of NRS, from
adopting an ordinance for the regulation of advertising relating to
cannabis which is more restrictive than the provisions of subsection
11 relating to:
(a) The number, location and size of signs, including, without
limitation, any signs carried or displayed by a natural person;
(b) Handbills, pamphlets, cards or other types of advertisements
that are distributed, excluding an advertisement placed in a
newspaper of general circulation, trade publication or other form of
print media;
(c) Any stationary or moving display that is located on or near
the premises of a cannabis establishment; and
(d) The content of any advertisement used by a cannabis
establishment if the ordinance sets forth specific prohibited content
for such an advertisement.
14. If a cannabis establishment engages in advertising for
which it is required to determine the percentage of persons who are
less than 21 years of age and who may reasonably be expected to
view or hear the advertisement, the cannabis establishment shall
maintain documentation for not less than 5 years after the date on
which the advertisement is first broadcasted, published or otherwise
displayed that demonstrates the manner in which the cannabis
establishment determined the reasonably expected age of the
audience for that advertisement.
15. To the extent that they are inconsistent or otherwise
conflict with the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS
678D.480, the requirements of this section pertaining to cannabis
products do not apply to ready-to-consume cannabis products
prepared and sold by a cannabis consumption lounge.
16. In addition to any other penalties provided for by law, the
Board may impose a civil penalty upon a cannabis establishment
that violates the provisions of subsection 11 or 14 as follows:
(a) For the first violation in the immediately preceding 2 years, a
civil penalty not to exceed $1,250.
(b) For the second violation in the immediately preceding 2
years, a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500.
(c) For the third violation in the immediately preceding 2 years,
a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000.
(d) For the fourth violation in the immediately preceding 2
years, a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.
17. As used in this section, “motor vehicle used for public
transportation” does not include a taxicab, as defined in
NRS 706.124.
-
*SB356*

– 12 –
Sec. 9. NRS 678B.650 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.650 The Board shall adopt such regulations as it
determines to be necessary or advisable to carry out the provisions
of this chapter. Such regulations are in addition to any requirements
set forth in statute and must, without limitation:
1. Prescribe the form and any additional required content of
applications for licenses or registration cards issued pursuant to this
chapter;
2. Establish procedures for the suspension or revocation of a
license or registration card or other disciplinary action to be taken
against a licensee or registrant;
3. Set forth rules pertaining to the safe and healthful operation
of cannabis establishments, including, without limitation:
(a) The manner of protecting against diversion and theft without
imposing an undue burden on cannabis establishments or
compromising the confidentiality of consumers and holders of
registry identification cards and letters of approval, as those terms
are defined in NRS 678C.080 and 678C.070, respectively;
(b) Minimum requirements for the oversight of cannabis
establishments;
(c) Minimum requirements for the keeping of records by
cannabis establishments;
(d) Provisions for the security of cannabis establishments,
including, without limitation, requirements for the protection by a
fully operational security alarm system of each cannabis
establishment; and
(e) Procedures pursuant to which cannabis establishments must
use the services of cannabis independent testing laboratories to
ensure that any cannabis or cannabis product , consumable hemp
product or other commodity or product made from hemp, as defined
in NRS 557.160, sold by a cannabis sales facility to an end user is
tested for content, quality and potency in accordance with standards
established by the Board;
4. Establish circumstances and procedures pursuant to which
the maximum fees set forth in NRS 678B.390 may be reduced over
time to ensure that the fees imposed pursuant to NRS 678B.390 are,
insofar as may be practicable, revenue neutral;
5. Establish different categories of cannabis establishment
agent registration cards, including, without limitation, criteria for
issuance of a cannabis establishment agent registration card for a
cannabis executive and a cannabis establishment agent registration
card for a cannabis receiver and criteria for training and
certification, for each of the different types of cannabis
establishments at which such an agent may be employed or
volunteer or provide labor as a cannabis establishment agent;
-
*SB356*

– 13 –
6. As far as possible while maintaining accountability, protect
the identity and personal identifying information of each person who
receives, facilitates or delivers services in accordance with this
chapter;
7. Establish procedures and requirements to enable a dual
licensee to operate a medical cannabis establishment and an adult-
use cannabis establishment at the same location;
8. Determine whether any provision of this chapter or chapter
678C or 678D of NRS would make the operation of a cannabis
establishment by a dual licensee unreasonably impracticable;
9. Allow for any record relating to the delivery of cannabis or
cannabis products that is required to be kept by a cannabis
establishment to be created and maintained in an electronic format;
10. Prescribe the manner in which the Board will determine
whether a person who holds an adult-use cannabis establishment
license is ineligible to hold additional licenses pursuant to NRS
678B.325 and 678B.328;
11. Set forth rules pertaining to the safe and healthful operation
of cannabis consumption lounges, including, without limitation:
(a) Standards for the air quality in a cannabis consumption
lounge;
(b) Procedures and requirements for the collection and disposal
of cannabis and cannabis products which are left at a cannabis
consumption lounge; and
(c) Requirements for the training of employees of a cannabis
consumption lounge in the sale and safe consumption of single-use
cannabis products and ready-to-consume cannabis products; and
12. Address such other matters as the Board deems necessary
to carry out the provisions of this title.
Sec. 10. NRS 678C.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678C.410 1. A medical cannabis establishment is prohibited
from acquiring, possessing, cultivating, manufacturing, delivering,
transferring, transporting, supplying or dispensing cannabis for any
purpose except to:
(a) Directly or indirectly assist patients who possess valid
registry identification cards;
(b) Assist patients who possess valid registry identification cards
or letters of approval by way of those patients’ designated primary
caregivers; and
(c) Return for a refund cannabis, medical edible cannabis
products or medical cannabis-infused products to the medical
cannabis establishment from which the cannabis, medical edible
cannabis products or medical cannabis-infused products were
acquired.
-
*SB356*

– 14 –
 For the purposes of this subsection, a person shall be deemed to
be a patient who possesses a valid registry identification card or
letter of approval if he or she qualifies for nonresident reciprocity
pursuant to NRS 678C.470.
2. A medical cannabis dispensary and a medical cultivation
facility may acquire usable cannabis or cannabis plants from a
person who holds a valid registry identification card, including,
without limitation, a designated primary caregiver. Except as
otherwise provided in this subsection, the patient or caregiver, as
applicable, must receive no compensation for the cannabis. A
patient who holds a valid registry identification card, and the
designated primary caregiver of such a patient, or the designated
primary caregiver of a person who holds a letter of approval may
sell usable cannabis to a medical cannabis dispensary one time and
may sell cannabis plants to a cultivation facility one time.
3. A medical cannabis production facility and a medical
cannabis dispensary may acquire hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160,
or a commodity or product made using such hemp from a grower or
handler registered by the State Department of Agriculture pursuant
to chapter 557 of NRS. A medical cannabis production facility may
use hemp or a commodity or product made using such hemp to
manufacture medical cannabis products. A medical cannabis
dispensary may , subject to the provisions of section 3 of this act,
dispense hemp or a commodity or product made using such hemp
and medical edible cannabis products and medical cannabis-infused
products manufactured using hemp or a commodity or product made
using such hemp.
4. A dual licensee:
(a) Shall comply with the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to subsection 7 of NRS 678B.650 with respect to the
medical cannabis establishment operated by the dual licensee; and
(b) May, to the extent authorized by such regulations, combine
the location or operations of the medical cannabis establishment
operated by the dual licensee with the adult-use cannabis
establishment operated by the dual licensee.
5. If a medical cannabis establishment is operated by a dual
licensee, any provision of this section which is determined by the
Board to be unreasonably impracticable pursuant to subsection 8 of
NRS 678B.650 does not apply to the medical cannabis
establishment.
Sec. 11. NRS 179.1164 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.1164 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the following property is subject to seizure and forfeiture in a
proceeding for forfeiture:
-
*SB356*

– 15 –
(a) Any proceeds attributable to the commission or attempted
commission of any felony.
(b) Any property or proceeds otherwise subject to forfeiture
pursuant to NRS 179.121, 200.760, 202.257, 370.419, 453.301 or
501.3857 [.] or section 3 of this act.
2. Property may not, to the extent of the interest of any
claimant, be declared forfeited by reason of an act or omission
shown to have been committed or omitted without the knowledge,
consent or willful blindness of the claimant.
3. Unless the owner of real property or a mobile home:
(a) Has given the tenant notice to surrender the premises
pursuant to NRS 40.254 within 90 days after the owner receives
notice of a conviction pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 453.305; or
(b) Shows the court that the owner had good cause not to evict
the tenant summarily pursuant to NRS 40.254,
 the owner of real property or a mobile home used or intended for
use by a tenant to facilitate any violation of the provisions of NRS
453.011 to 453.552, inclusive, except NRS 453.336, is disputably
presumed to have known of and consented to that use if the notices
required by NRS 453.305 have been given in connection with
another such violation relating to the property or mobile home. The
holder of a lien or encumbrance on the property or mobile home is
disputably presumed to have acquired an interest in the property for
fair value and without knowledge or consent to such use, regardless
of when the act giving rise to the forfeiture occurred.
Sec. 12. NRS 439.532 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.532 1. [Unless] In addition to any applicable
requirements set forth in section 3 of this act, and unless federal
law or regulation otherwise requires, a person shall not sell or offer
to sell any consumable hemp product, any other commodity or
product containing hemp which is intended for human consumption
or any other commodity or product that purports to contain
cannabidiol with a THC concentration that does not exceed the
maximum THC concentration [established by federal law] set forth
in NRS 557.160 for hemp unless such a commodity or product:
(a) Has been tested by [an] a cannabis independent testing
laboratory and meets the standards established by regulation of the
Department pursuant to subsection 3; and
(b) Is labeled in accordance with the regulations adopted by the
Department pursuant to subsection 3.
2. A person who produces or offers for sale a commodity or
product described in subsection 1 may submit such a commodity or
product to a cannabis independent testing laboratory for testing
pursuant to this section and a cannabis independent testing
laboratory may perform such testing.
-
*SB356*

– 16 –
3. The Department shall adopt regulations requiring the testing
and labeling of any commodity or product described in subsection 1.
Such regulations must:
(a) Set forth protocols and procedures for the testing of the
commodities and products described in subsection 1;
(b) Identify contaminants of the commodities and products
described in subsection 1 which are foods that contain an approved
hemp component, as defined in NRS 446.844, and prescribe
tolerances for such contaminants; and
(c) Require that any commodity or product described in
subsection 1 is labeled in a manner that is not false or misleading in
accordance with the applicable provisions of chapters 446 and 585
of NRS.
4. The provisions of this section do not apply to a cannabis
establishment, as defined in NRS 678A.095.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Cannabis independent testing laboratory” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 678A.115.
(b) “Consumable hemp product” has the meaning ascribed to
it in section 2 of this act.
(c) “Food” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 446.017.
[(c)] (d) “Hemp” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 557.160.
[(d)] (e) “Intended for human consumption” means intended for
ingestion or inhalation by a human or for topical application to the
skin or hair of a human.
[(e)] (f) “THC” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 453.139.
Sec. 13. NRS 453.096 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453.096 1. “Marijuana” means:
(a) All parts of any plant of the genus Cannabis, whether
growing or not;
(b) The resin extracted from any part of the plant, including
concentrated cannabis;
(c) Every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or
preparation of the plant, or its resin;
(d) Any commodity or product made using hemp which exceeds
the maximum THC concentration [established by the State
Department of Agriculture] set forth in NRS 557.160 for hemp; and
(e) Any product or commodity made from hemp which is
manufactured or sold by a cannabis establishment which violates
any regulation adopted by the Cannabis Compliance Board pursuant
to paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of NRS 678A.450 relating to THC
concentration.
2. “Marijuana” does not include:
-
*SB356*

– 17 –
(a) Hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160, which is grown or
cultivated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 557 of NRS;
(b) The mature stalks of the plant and root balls which have
been fully separated from the stalks of the plant after harvest, fiber
produced from the stalks, seeds of the plant, oil or cake made from
the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt,
derivative, mixture or preparation of the mature stalks (except the
resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil or cake; or
(c) Any commodity or product made using hemp, as defined in
NRS 557.160, which does not exceed the maximum THC
concentration [established by the State Department of Agriculture]
set forth in NRS 557.160 for hemp.
Sec. 14. NRS 557.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
557.160 1. “Hemp” means any plant of the genus Cannabis
sativa L. and any part of such a plant, including, without limitation,
the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids,
isomers, acids, salts and salts of isomers, whether growing or not,
with a THC concentration that does not exceed [the maximum THC
concentration established by the Department for hemp.] 0.3 percent
on a dry weight basis, as measured using post-decarboxylation or
another similarly reliable testing method.
2. “Hemp” does not include any commodity or product made
using hemp.
Sec. 15. NRS 557.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
557.240 1. A grower or handler shall keep and maintain for a
period of not less than 3 years such records as the Department may
prescribe by regulation and, upon 3 days’ notice, make such records
available to the Department for inspection during normal business
hours. The Department may inspect records pursuant to this
subsection to determine whether a person has complied with the
provisions of this chapter, the regulations adopted pursuant thereto
and any lawful order of the Department.
2. The Department may inspect any growing crop of a grower
and take a representative sample for analysis in the field. If the
testing of such a sample in the field determines that the crop
contains a THC concentration that exceeds the maximum THC
concentration [established by the Department] set forth in NRS
557.160 for hemp, the grower shall submit a plan for the effective
disposal or remediation of the crop to the Department for its
approval.
3. If a crop has been determined pursuant to subsection 2 to
contain a THC concentration that exceeds the maximum THC
concentration [established by the Department] set forth in NRS
557.160 for hemp, the grower of the crop may elect to perform
remediation activities to render the crop compliant. After a grower
-
*SB356*

– 18 –
performs remediation activities pursuant to a plan for the effective
remediation of a crop approved pursuant to subsection 2, an
additional inspection, sampling and testing of the crop must be
conducted to determine the THC concentration of the crop.
4. If a grower fails to submit an approved plan to the
Department pursuant to subsection 2 or fails to follow the provisions
of such a plan, or if a crop continues to contain a THC concentration
that exceeds the maximum THC concentration [established by the
Department] set forth in NRS 557.160 for hemp after remediation
pursuant to subsection 3, the Department may:
(a) Impose any additional requirement it determines necessary
upon the grower;
(b) Suspend or revoke the registration of the grower;
(c) Impose an administrative fine pursuant to NRS 557.280 on
the grower;
(d) Report the grower to the appropriate local law enforcement
agency for investigation of a violation of the provisions of chapter
453 of NRS; or
(e) Detain, seize or embargo the crop.
5. If the Department determines that the land or crop
management practices of a grower, handler or producer are
inadequate, inconsistent with the information concerning such
practices submitted to the Department pursuant to NRS 557.200 or
negatively affect natural resources, the Department may impose an
administrative fine pursuant to NRS 557.280.
Sec. 16. NRS 557.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
557.260 1. The Department may adopt regulations necessary
to:
(a) Establish quality standards and requirements for the
packaging and labeling of agricultural hemp seed;
(b) Provide for the certification and registration of sites used for
growing, producing or handling hemp; and
(c) Comply with any requirement imposed by the United States
Department of Agriculture, including, without limitation, any
requirement related to reporting information regarding growers,
handlers and producers.
2. [The Department shall adopt regulations establishing the
maximum THC concentration for hemp.
3.] A producer shall comply with:
(a) Any regulation adopted by the Department pursuant to
subsection 1 ; [or 2;] and
(b) The provisions of NRS 587.015 to 587.123, inclusive, and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
[4.] 3. Any agricultural hemp seed which is obtained by a
grower and was produced:
-
*SB356*

– 19 –
(a) In this State must be produced by a producer; and
(b) In another state must be produced by a person who is
registered and approved to produce and sell agricultural hemp seed
pursuant to the laws of that state.
[5.] 4. The Department shall provide adequate information to
growers to identify producers from which a grower may purchase
agricultural hemp seed.
[6.] 5. A handler may only obtain hemp from a grower and
agricultural hemp seed for cleaning and future propagation from a
producer.
Sec. 17. NRS 557.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
557.270 1. A grower, handler or producer may submit hemp
or a commodity or product made using hemp, other than a
commodity or product described in subsection 1 of NRS 439.532, to
a cannabis independent testing laboratory for testing pursuant to this
section and a cannabis independent testing laboratory may perform
such testing.
2. Before the harvest of any crop, the Department shall collect
a sample of the crop. A grower or producer must harvest a crop in a
timely manner after the collection of such a sample and within the
period of time prescribed in the regulations promulgated by the
Secretary of Agriculture of the United States pursuant to 7 U.S.C. §
1639r. A grower or producer who does not harvest a crop within that
period of time shall not harvest the crop before the Department has
collected a new sample of the crop.
3. The Department or a cannabis independent testing laboratory
approved by the Department shall test each sample collected
pursuant to subsection 2 to determine whether the crop has a THC
concentration that exceeds the maximum THC concentration
[established by the Department] set forth in NRS 557.160 for hemp.
The Department may adopt regulations relating to such testing
which include, without limitation:
(a) Protocols and procedures for the testing of a crop, including,
without limitation, determining appropriate standards for sampling
and for the size of batches for testing; and
(b) A requirement that a cannabis independent testing laboratory
provide the results of the testing directly to the Department in a
manner prescribed by the Department.
4. When the Department has obtained the results of the testing
required by subsection 3, the Department shall issue to the grower
or producer of the crop a report of the results of the testing which
must include, without limitation, the THC concentration of the crop.
5. A crop which is harvested before a sample has been
collected by the Department pursuant to subsection 2 shall be
deemed to have failed the testing required by subsection 3 and may
-
*SB356*

– 20 –
be detained, seized or embargoed by the Department. The
Department shall not renew the registration of a grower or producer
who harvests a crop before a sample has been collected by the
Department pursuant to subsection 2.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and by federal
law, a grower or producer whose crop fails a test prescribed by the
Department pursuant to this section may request that the Department
collect a new sample of that same crop for retesting. The
Department shall adopt regulations establishing protocols and
procedures for such retesting.
7. As used in this section, “cannabis independent testing
laboratory” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 678A.115.
Sec. 18. NRS 638.135 is hereby amended to read as follows:
638.135 1. A licensed veterinarian may:
(a) Administer to an animal a product containing hemp or CBD
if the product:
(1) Has a THC concentration of not more than [0.3 percent
on a dry weight basis;] the maximum THC concentration set forth
in NRS 557.160 for hemp; and
(2) Is intended for use or consumption through means other
than inhalation to treat a condition of the animal; and
(b) Recommend to the owner of an animal the use of such a
product to treat a condition of the animal.
2. The Board shall not take any disciplinary action against a
licensed veterinarian or the facility in which the licensed
veterinarian engages in the practice of veterinary medicine solely for
administering or recommending the use of products pursuant to
subsection 1.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Administer” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 453.021.
(b) “CBD” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 453.033.
(c) “Hemp” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 557.160.
(d) “THC” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 453.139.
H
-
*SB356*